Massachusetts, session 194th, S597.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:
Section 2EEEEEE. (a) In order to deliver nature-based solutions to climate change,
protect biodiversity, and ensure equitable access to nature, there shall be established and set up
on the books of the commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Nature for All Fund,
which shall be used exclusively for conserving and improving natural and working lands as
defined in section 1 of chapter 21N.
The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall make expenditures from
the Nature for All Fund for the following purposes: (1) the creation and improvement of parks,
greenspaces, trails, and outdoor recreation access, especially those in underserved
neighborhoods; (2) the conservation or restoration of land to protect drinking water and the
of 6

quality of streams, rivers, lakes and coasts; (3) the conservation or restoration of farms, forests,
and other land to advance statewide biodiversity goals, climate goals, natural and working lands
goals, resiliency goals, and environmental justice goals; (4) the conservation of land parcels to
provide connectivity between open spaces; (5) the conservation and restoration of lands of
indigenous cultural significance and the restoration of access for indigenous people; and (6) the
provision of ongoing stewardship, outdoor recreation access, and management of such resources.
(b) Municipalities, regional municipal partnerships, regional planning bodies, watershed
associations, land trusts, conservation organizations, state agencies, tribal authorities, and other
non-profit organizations shall be lawful recipients of such expenditures.
(c) There shall be credited to the fund all monies received by the commonwealth from the
receipts from sales and use of goods and services classified under the 2022 revision of the North
American Industry Classification Codes 459110, 441210, and 713910 under chapter 64H;
provided that in the event such codes are changed, that successor codes shall be used; and
provided further, such amount shall not include any portion of the taxes that constitute special
receipts within the meaning of subsection (b 1/2) of section 10 of chapter 152 of the acts of 1997.
The amount credited to the fund under this subsection shall be net of the dedicated sales
tax revenue amount transferred to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority State and
Local Contribution Fund under section 35T of chapter 10 and to the School Modernization and
Reconstruction Trust Fund under section 35BB of said chapter 10. The fund may accept public
and private gifts, grants and donations to further the purposes of this section, and any other
monies credited to or transferred from any other source pursuant to state law.
of 6

The fund shall be used for expenditures related to the conservation and improvement of
natural and working lands by the executive office of energy and environmental affairs, subject to
the provisions of subsection (a) and (d), including to pay or reimburse the General Fund for
payment of debt service on bonds issued by, or otherwise payable under a lease or other contract
assistance agreement by the commonwealth for land protection purposes.
(d) There shall be a 15-member board called the nature for all board comprised of the
secretary of energy and environmental affairs, commissioner of fish and game, the commissioner
of conservation and recreation, the secretary of housing and livable communities, and the climate
chief, and ten members of the public to be appointed by the Governor, hereinafter called the
board. The ten public members shall include representatives of underserved communities and
indigenous people, and people with expertise or experience in the purposes listed in section (a).
The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall hire staff necessary to manage the
fund and expenditures from the fund, provided that such additional staff may be funded through
the fund. The board shall approve regulations for expenditures from the nature for all fund by
the executive office of energy and environmental affairs, including, but not limited to: (i)
requirements for land conservation in environmental justice neighborhoods; (ii) requirements for
access and restoration of indigenous land, (iii) guidelines to promote conservation in concert
with affordable housing development; (iv) the scope and prioritization of bonds issued pursuant
to this section; and (v) prioritization of programs based on progress towards the state goals
enumerated in section (c)(3). The board shall have the authority to approve expenditures made
from the fund.
(e) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall not make expenditures
in accordance with this section that result in, or supplant, a year-over-year decrease in bond cap
of 6

spending or program investments made pursuant to its five-year rolling capital plan. The board
shall promulgate limits on the amount of expenditures may be made from the trust fund to
supplement existing capital programs.
(f) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall submit annually to the
board, the Environmental Justice Council established in section 62L of chapter 30, the House and
Senate Committees on Ways & Means, and the Joint Committee on Environment & Natural
Resources a report of the proportion of funds expended from the Nature for All Fund that are
dedicated to the acquisition or improvement of land in cities or towns containing environmental
justice populations as defined in section 62 of chapter 30.
(g) When authorized by a vote taken by the yeas and nays of two-thirds of each house of
the general court present and voting on such authorization, the state treasurer, upon the request of
the governor, may issue bonds of the commonwealth as hereinafter provided. Any such bonds
shall be special obligations of the commonwealth payable solely from monies credited to the
Nature for All Trust Fund established in this section; provided, however, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, such bonds shall not be general obligations of the
commonwealth. Bonds may be issued in such manner and on such terms and conditions as the
state treasurer may determine in accordance with this paragraph and, to the extent not
inconsistent with this paragraph, the General Laws for the issuance of bonds of the
commonwealth. Bonds may be secured by a trust agreement entered into by the state treasurer,
with the concurrence of the secretary of administration and finance and the secretary of energy
and environmental affairs, on behalf of the commonwealth, which trust agreement may pledge or
assign all or any part of monies credited to the Nature for All Trust Fund and rights to receive the
same, whether existing or coming into existence and whether held or thereafter acquired, and the
of 6

proceeds thereof. The state treasurer may, with the concurrence of the secretary of administration
and finance and the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, enter into additional security,
insurance or other forms of credit enhancement which may be secured on a parity or subordinate
basis with the bonds. A pledge in any such trust agreement or credit enhancement agreement
shall be valid and binding from the time such pledge shall be made without any physical delivery
or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having
claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise, whether such parties have notice thereof or not.
Any such pledge shall be perfected by filing of the trust agreement or credit enhancement
agreement in the records of the state treasurer and no filing need be made under chapter 106.
Any such trust agreement or credit enhancement agreement may establish provisions defining
defaults and establishing remedies and other matters relating to the rights and security of the
holders of the bonds or other secured parties as determined by the state treasurer, including
provisions relating to the establishment of reserves, the issuance of additional or refunding
bonds, whether or not secured on a parity basis, the application of receipts, monies or funds
pledged pursuant to such agreement, the regulation of the custody, investment and application of
monies and such other matters deemed necessary or desirable by the state treasurer for the
security of such bonds. Any such bonds shall be deemed to be investment securities under
chapter 106, securities in which any public officer, fiduciary, insurance company, financial
institution or investment company may properly invest funds and securities which may be
deposited with any public custodian for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds is authorized
by law. Any such bonds, the transfer of such bonds and the income from such bonds, including
100 profit on the sale of such bonds, shall at all times be exempt from taxation by and within the
101 commonwealth.
of 6

102 The provisions of this section relating to bonds shall also be applicable to the issuance of
103 notes insofar as such provisions may be appropriate for such notes.
104 In order to increase the marketability of any such bonds or notes issued by the
105 commonwealth and in consideration of the acceptance of payment for any such bonds or notes,
106 the commonwealth covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent holders and transferees of
107 any such bonds or notes that while any such bond or note shall remain outstanding, and so long
108 as the principal of or interest on any such bond or note shall remain unpaid: (i) no pledged funds
109 shall be diverted from the Nature for All Trust Fund; (ii) in any fiscal year of the commonwealth
110 and until an appropriation has been made which is sufficient to pay the principal, including
111 sinking fund payments, of and interest on all such bonds and notes of the commonwealth and to
112 provide for or maintain any reserves, additional security, insurance or other forms of credit
113 enhancement required or provided for in any trust agreement securing any such bonds or notes,
114 no pledged funds shall be applied to any other use; and (iii) so long as such revenues are
115 necessary, as determined by the state treasurer in accordance with any applicable trust agreement
116 or credit enhancement agreement, for the purposes for which they have been pledged, and
117 notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the rates of the excises imposed in
118 chapters 64H shall not be reduced below the amount in effect at the time of issuance of any such
119 bond or note.
of 6